Utah statutes.
20A-11-302 (Superseded 01/01/11).   Legislative office candidate --
Financial reporting requirements -- Year-end summary report.
(1) (a)  Each legislative office candidate shall file a summary report by
January 10 of the year after the regular general election year.
(b)  Beginning with the 2008 regular general election and in addition to the
requirements of Subsection (1)(a), a former legislative office candidate that
has not filed the statement of dissolution and final summary report required
under Section 20A-11-304 shall continue to file a summary report on January 10
of each year.
(2) (a)  Each summary report shall include the following information as of
December 31 of the previous year:
(i)  the net balance of the last summary report, if any;
(ii)  a single figure equal to the total amount of receipts reported on all
interim reports, if any, during the calendar year in which the summary report
is due;
(iii)  a single figure equal to the total amount of expenditures reported on
all interim reports, if any, filed during the previous year;
(iv)  a detailed listing of each receipt, contribution, and public service
assistance since the last summary report that has not been reported in detail
on an interim report;
(v)  for each nonmonetary contribution:
(A)  the fair market value of the contribution with that information provided
by the contributor; and
(B)  a specific description of the contribution;
(vi)  a detailed listing of each expenditure made since the last summary
report that has not been reported in detail on an interim report;
(vii)  for each nonmonetary expenditure, the fair market value of the
expenditure; and
(viii)  a net balance for the year consisting of the net balance from the last
summary report, if any, plus all receipts minus all expenditures.
(b) (i)  For all individual contributions or public service assistance of $50
or less, a single aggregate figure may be reported without separate detailed
listings.
(ii)  Two or more contributions from the same source that have an aggregate
total of more than $50 may not be reported in the aggregate, but shall be
reported separately.
(c)  In preparing the report, all receipts and expenditures shall be reported
as of December 31 of the previous year.
(3)  The summary report shall contain a paragraph signed by the legislative
office candidate certifying that to the best of the candidate's knowledge, all
receipts and all expenditures have been reported as of December 31 of the
previous year and that there are no bills or obligations outstanding and
unpaid except as set forth in that report.
